2015/42_firmas/dict/espa~nol.aff
flag *Z:        # Verbos transitivos pronominales irregulares en el gerundio
    E R		> -ER, 'ERMELO		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, 'ERMELA		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, 'ERMELOS		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, 'ERMELAS		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, 'ERTELO		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, 'ERTELA		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, 'ERTELOS		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, 'ERTELAS		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, 'ERSELO		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, 'ERSELA		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, 'ERSELOS		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, 'ERSELAS		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, 'EROSLO		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, 'EROSLA		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, 'EROSLOS		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, 'EROSLAS		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, 'ERNOSLO		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, 'ERNOSLA		# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, 'ERNOSLOS	# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, 'ERNOSLAS	# comer > comerse
    E R		> -ER, 'ERNOSLES	# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IRMELO		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IRMELA		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IRMELE		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IRMELOS		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IRMELAS		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IRMELES		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IRTELO		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IRTELA		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IRTELE		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IRTELOS		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IRTELAS		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IRTELES		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IRSELO		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IRSELA		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IRSELE		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IRSELOS		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IRSELAS		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IRSELES		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IROSLO		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IROSLA		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IROSLE		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IROSLOS		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IROSLAS		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IROSLES		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IRNOSLO		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IRNOSLA		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IRNOSLE		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IRNOSLOS	# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IRNOSLAS	# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, 'IRNOSLES	# comer > comerse

    [AEO] E R	> -ER, Y'ENDOMELO	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, Y'ENDOMELA	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, Y'ENDOMELE	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, Y'ENDOMELOS	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, Y'ENDOMELAS	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, Y'ENDOMELES	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, Y'ENDOTELO	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, Y'ENDOTELA	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, Y'ENDOTELE	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, Y'ENDOTELOS	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, Y'ENDOTELAS	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, Y'ENDOTELES	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, Y'ENDOSELO	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, Y'ENDOSELA	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, Y'ENDOSELE	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, Y'ENDOSELOS	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, Y'ENDOSELAS	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, Y'ENDOSELES	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, Y'ENDOOSLO	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, Y'ENDOOSLA	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, Y'ENDOOSLE	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, Y'ENDOOSLOS	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, Y'ENDOOSLAS	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, Y'ENDOOSLES	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, Y'ENDONOSLO	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, Y'ENDONOSLA	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, Y'ENDONOSLE	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, Y'ENDONOSLOS	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, Y'ENDONOSLAS	# traer > comerse
    [AEO] E R	> -ER, Y'ENDONOSLES	# traer > comerse
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, Y'ENDOMELO	# incluir > incluy'endomelo
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, Y'ENDOMELOS	# incluir > incluy'endose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, Y'ENDOMELA	# incluir > incluy'endose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, Y'ENDOMELAS	# incluir > incluy'endose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, Y'ENDOMELE	# incluir > incluy'endose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, Y'ENDOMELES	# incluir > incluy'endose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, Y'ENDOTELO	# incluir > incluy'endomelo
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, Y'ENDOTELOS	# incluir > incluy'endose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, Y'ENDOTELA	# incluir > incluy'endose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, Y'ENDOTELAS	# incluir > incluy'endose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, Y'ENDOTELE	# incluir > incluy'endose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, Y'ENDOTELES	# incluir > incluy'endose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, Y'ENDOSELO	# incluir > incluy'endomelo
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, Y'ENDOSELOS	# incluir > incluy'endose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, Y'ENDOSELA	# incluir > incluy'endose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, Y'ENDOSELAS	# incluir > incluy'endose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, Y'ENDOSELE	# incluir > incluy'endose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, Y'ENDOSELES	# incluir > incluy'endose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, Y'ENDOOSLO	# incluir > incluy'endomelo
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, Y'ENDOOSLOS	# incluir > incluy'endose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, Y'ENDOOSLA	# incluir > incluy'endose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, Y'ENDOOSLAS	# incluir > incluy'endose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, Y'ENDOOSLE	# incluir > incluy'endose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, Y'ENDOOSLES	# incluir > incluy'endose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, Y'ENDONOSLO	# incluir > incluy'endomelo
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, Y'ENDONOSLOS	# incluir > incluy'endose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, Y'ENDONOSLA	# incluir > incluy'endose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, Y'ENDONOSLAS	# incluir > incluy'endose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, Y'ENDONOSLE	# incluir > incluy'endose
    [^G] U I R 	> -IR, Y'ENDONOSLES	# incluir > incluy'endose
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGI'ENDOMELO
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGI'ENDOMELOS
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGI'ENDOMELA
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGI'ENDOMELAS
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGI'ENDOMELE
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGI'ENDOMELES
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGI'ENDOTELO
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGI'ENDOTELOS
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGI'ENDOTELA
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGI'ENDOTELAS
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGI'ENDOTELE
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGI'ENDOTELES
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGI'ENDOSELO
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGI'ENDOSELOS
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGI'ENDOSELA
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGI'ENDOSELAS
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGI'ENDOSELE
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGI'ENDOSELES
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGI'ENDOOSLO
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGI'ENDOOSLOS
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGI'ENDOOSLA
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGI'ENDOOSLAS
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGI'ENDOOSLE
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGI'ENDOOSLES
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGI'ENDONOSLO
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGI'ENDONOSLOS
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGI'ENDONOSLA
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGI'ENDONOSLAS
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGI'ENDONOSLE
    E G I R	> -EGIR, IGI'ENDONOSLES
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUI'ENDOMELO		# incluir > incluy'endomelo
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUI'ENDOMELOS	# incluir > incluy'endose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUI'ENDOMELA		# incluir > incluy'endose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUI'ENDOMELAS	# incluir > incluy'endose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUI'ENDOMELE		# incluir > incluy'endose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUI'ENDOMELES	# incluir > incluy'endose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUI'ENDOTELO		# incluir > incluy'endomelo
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUI'ENDOTELOS	# incluir > incluy'endose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUI'ENDOTELA		# incluir > incluy'endose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUI'ENDOTELAS	# incluir > incluy'endose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUI'ENDOTELE		# incluir > incluy'endose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUI'ENDOTELES	# incluir > incluy'endose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUI'ENDOSELO		# incluir > incluy'endomelo
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUI'ENDOSELOS	# incluir > incluy'endose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUI'ENDOSELA		# incluir > incluy'endose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUI'ENDOSELAS	# incluir > incluy'endose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUI'ENDOSELE		# incluir > incluy'endose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUI'ENDOSELES	# incluir > incluy'endose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUI'ENDOOSLO		# incluir > incluy'endomelo
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUI'ENDOOSLOS	# incluir > incluy'endose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUI'ENDOOSLA		# incluir > incluy'endose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUI'ENDOOSLAS	# incluir > incluy'endose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUI'ENDOOSLE		# incluir > incluy'endose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUI'ENDOOSLES	# incluir > incluy'endose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUI'ENDONOSLO	# incluir > incluy'endomelo
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUI'ENDONOSLOS	# incluir > incluy'endose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUI'ENDONOSLA	# incluir > incluy'endose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUI'ENDONOSLAS	# incluir > incluy'endose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUI'ENDONOSLE	# incluir > incluy'endose
    E G U I R	> -EGUIR, IGUI'ENDONOSLES	# incluir > incluy'endose
